Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7706
Credit information; notice; insurer; duties.

If it is determined through the dispute resolution process set forth in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, as such act existed on January 1, 2003, 15 U.S.C. 1681i(a)(5), that the credit information of a current insured was incorrect or incomplete and if the insurer receives notice of such determination either from the consumer reporting agency or from the insured, the insurer shall reunderwrite and rerate the consumer within thirty days after receiving the notice. After reunderwriting or rerating the insured, the insurer shall make any adjustments necessary, consistent with its underwriting and rating guidelines. If an insurer determines that the insured has overpaid a premium, the insurer shall refund to the insured the amount of overpayment calculated back to the shorter of either the last twelve months of coverage or the actual policy period.

Laws 2003, LB 487, § 6.